th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้ง: พอร์ตเสื้อสูบ (ช่องทางเดินน้ำมันเครื่อง); เสื้อกรองน้ำมันเครื่อง; ท่อน้ำมันเครื่อง; ติดตั้งแยกส่วน (สายยาง/ท่อ); อะแดปเตอร์แผ่นแซนด์วิช; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Locația de instalare: Port pe blocul motor (galerie de ulei); Carcasă filtru de ulei; Conductă de ulei; Montare la distanță (furtun/conductă); Adaptor tip placă sandwich; Altele
nl: Installatie locatie: Motorblokpoort (oliekanaal); Oliefilterbehuizing; Olieleiding; Bevestiging op afstand (slang/leiding); Sandwichplaatadapter; Overige
pt-BR: Instalação local: Porta do bloco do motor (galeria de óleo); Alojamento do filtro de óleo; Linha de óleo; Montagem remota (mangueira/linha); Adaptador de placa sanduíche; Outro
zh-CN: 安装位置: 发动机缸体端口（油道）; 机油滤清器壳体; 油管; 远程安装（软管/管线）; 夹心板适配器; 其他
sk-SK: Lokalita inštalácie: Port bloku motora (olejový kanál); Teleso olejového filtra; Olejové vedenie; Vzdialená montáž (hadica/vedenie); Adaptér sendvičovej dosky; Iné
da: Installationssted: Motorblokport (oliekanal); Oliefilterhus; Olieslange; Fjernmontering (slange/rør); Sandwichpladeadapter; Andet
bg-BG: Място на монтаж: Отвор на двигателния блок (маслена магистрала); Корпус на масления филтър; Маслопровод; Дистанционен монтаж (маркуч/тръба); Адаптер тип сандвич; Други
pt-PT: Localização de instalação: Porta do bloco do motor (galeria de óleo); Caixa do filtro de óleo; Tubo de óleo; Montagem remota (mangueira/linha); Adaptador de placa sanduíche; Outro
pl: Miejsce montażu: Port bloku silnika (magistrala olejowa); Obudowa filtra oleju; Przewód olejowy; Montaż zdalny (wąż/przewód); Adapter typu sandwich; Inne
el: Θέση εγκατάστασης: Θύρα μπλοκ κινητήρα (δίοδος λαδιού); Περίβλημα φίλτρου λαδιού; Γραμμή λαδιού; Απομακρυσμένη τοποθέτηση (σωλήνας/γραμμή); Αντάπτορας πλάκας σάντουιτς (sandwich plate); Άλλο
sl-SI: Mesto namestitve: Odprtina motornega bloka (oljna galerija); Ohišje oljnega filtra; Oljni vod; Oddaljena vgradnja (cev/vod); Adapter s sendvič ploščo; Drugo
ja: 設置場所: エンジンブロックポート (オイルギャラリー); オイルフィルターハウジング; オイルライン; リモートマウント (ホース/ライン); サンドイッチプレートアダプター; その他
lt-LT: Montavimo vieta: Variklio bloko anga (alyvos kanalas); Alyvos filtro korpusas; Alyvos linija; Nuotolinis montavimas (žarna / linija); „Sandwich“ plokštės adapteris; Kita
fi: Asennuksen sijainti: Moottorilohkon portti (öljykanava); Öljynsuodatinkotelo; Öljyputki; Etäasennus (letku/putki); Sandwich-laippa-adapteri; Muu
zh-TW: 安裝位置: 引擎本體開口 (油道); 機油濾清器外殼; 油管; 遠端安裝 (軟管/管線); 夾心板轉接器; 其他
fr: Emplacement d’installation: Orifice du bloc moteur (galerie d’huile); Boîtier de filtre à huile; Conduite d’huile; Montage à distance (tuyau/conduite); Adaptateur de plaque sandwich; Autre
it: Sede dell'installazione: Porta del blocco motore (canale dell’olio); Alloggiamento del filtro dell’olio; Tubo dell’olio; Montaggio remoto (tubo/linea); Adattatore a piastra sandwich; Altro
hr-HR: Lokacija instalacije: Otvor na bloku motora (uljna galerija); Kućište filtra za ulje; Cijev za ulje; Udaljena montaža (crijevo/cijev); Adapter sendvič-ploče; Ostalo
hu: Telepítési helyszín: Motorblokk port (olajjárat); Olajszűrőház; Olajvezeték; Távoli rögzítés (tömlő/vezeték); Szendvicslemez adapter; Egyéb
es: Lugar de instalación: Puerto del bloque del motor (galería de aceite); Carcasa del filtro de aceite; Línea de aceite; Montaje remoto (manguera/línea); Adaptador de placa tipo sándwich; Otro
cs: Místo instalace: Port bloku motoru (olejový kanál); Kryt olejového filtru; Olejové vedení; Vzdálená montáž (hadice/vedení); Adaptér sendvičové desky; Jiné
tr: Kurulum yeri: Motor bloğu portu (yağ galerisi); Yağ filtresi yuvası; Yağ hattı; Uzaktan montaj (hortum/hat); Sandviç plaka adaptörü; Diğer
sv: Installationsplats: Motorblocket (oljekanal); Oljefilterhus; Oljeledning; Fjärrmontering (slang/ledning); Sandwich-adapter; Övrigt
nb: Monteringssted: Motorblokkport (oljekanal); Oljefilterhus; Oljeledning; Ekstern montering (slange/ledning); Sandwich-plateadapter; Annet
de: Installationsort: Motorblockanschluss (Ölkanal); Ölfiltergehäuse; Ölleitung; Abgesetzte Montage (Schlauch/Leitung); Sandwichplatten-Adapter; Sonstige
en: Installation location: Engine block port (oil gallery); Oil filter housing; Oil line; Remote mount (hose/line); Sandwich plate adapter; Other
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt: Cổng khối động cơ (đường dẫn dầu); Vỏ bộ lọc dầu; Đường dẫn dầu; Gắn từ xa (ống/đường dẫn); Bộ chuyển đổi dạng đĩa đệm (sandwich); Khác
ko: 설치 위치: 엔진 블록 포트(오일 갤러리); 오일 필터 하우징; 오일 라인; 원격 마운트(호스/라인); 샌드위치 플레이트 어댑터; 기타
ru: Место установки: Канал в блоке цилиндров (масляная магистраль); Корпус масляного фильтра; Маслопровод; Удаленный монтаж (шланг/линия); Адаптер масляного фильтра (проставка); Другое